Illinois, session 104th, SB2187.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-13 and 20-5 and by adding Section 45-115 6and Article 60 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 500/1-13)8    Sec. 1-13. Applicability to public institutions of higher 9education.10    (a) This Code shall apply to public institutions of higher 11education, regardless of the source of the funds with which 12contracts are paid, except as provided in this Section.13    (b) Except as provided in this Section, this Code shall 14not apply to procurements made by or on behalf of public 15institutions of higher education for any of the following:16        (1) Memberships in professional, academic, research, 17    or athletic organizations on behalf of a public 18    institution of higher education, an employee of a public 19    institution of higher education, or a student at a public 20    institution of higher education.21        (2) Procurement expenditures for events or activities 22    paid for exclusively by revenues generated by the event or 23    activity, gifts or donations for the event or activity,   SB2187- 2 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    private grants, or any combination thereof.2        (3) Procurement expenditures for events or activities 3    for which the use of specific potential contractors is 4    mandated or identified by the sponsor of the event or 5    activity, provided that the sponsor is providing a 6    majority of the funding for the event or activity.7        (4) Procurement expenditures necessary to provide 8    athletic, artistic or musical services, performances, 9    events, or productions by or for a public institution of 10    higher education.11        (5) Procurement expenditures for periodicals, books, 12    subscriptions, database licenses, and other publications 13    procured for use by a university library or academic 14    department, except for expenditures related to procuring 15    textbooks for student use or materials for resale or 16    rental.17        (6) Procurement expenditures for placement of students 18    in externships, practicums, field experiences, and for 19    medical residencies and rotations. 20        (7) Contracts for programming and broadcast license 21    rights for university-operated radio and television 22    stations. 23        (8) Procurement expenditures necessary to perform 24    sponsored research and other sponsored activities under 25    grants and contracts funded by the sponsor or by sources 26    other than State appropriations.  SB2187- 3 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1        (9) Contracts with a foreign entity for research or 2    educational activities, provided that the foreign entity 3    either does not maintain an office in the United States or 4    is the sole source of the service or product. 5        (10) Procurement expenditures for any ongoing software 6    license or maintenance agreement or competitively 7    solicited software purchase, when the software, license, 8    or maintenance agreement is available through only the 9    software creator or its manufacturer and not a reseller. 10        (11) Procurement expenditures incurred outside of the 11    United States for the recruitment of international 12    students. 13        (12) Procurement expenditures for contracts entered 14    into under the Public University Energy Conservation Act. 15        (13) Procurement expenditures for advertising 16    purchased directly from a media station or the owner of 17    the station for distribution of advertising. 18Notice of each contract with an annual value of more than 19$100,000 entered into by a public institution of higher 20education that is related to the procurement of goods and 21services identified in items (1) through (13) of this 22subsection shall be published in the Procurement Bulletin 23within 14 calendar days after contract execution. The Chief 24Procurement Officer shall prescribe the form and content of 25the notice. Each public institution of higher education shall 26provide the Chief Procurement Officer, on a monthly basis, in   SB2187- 4 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1the form and content prescribed by the Chief Procurement 2Officer, a report of contracts that are related to the 3procurement of goods and services identified in this 4subsection. At a minimum, this report shall include the name 5of the contractor, a description of the supply or service 6provided, the total amount of the contract, the term of the 7contract, and the exception to the Code utilized. A copy of any 8or all of these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 9Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 10Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor and 11General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year that 12shall include, at a minimum, an annual summary of the monthly 13information reported to the Chief Procurement Officer.14    (b-5) Except as provided in this subsection, the 15provisions of this Code shall not apply to contracts for 16medical supplies or to contracts for medical services 17necessary for the delivery of care and treatment at medical, 18dental, pharmaceutical, or veterinary teaching facilities used 19by Southern Illinois University or the University of Illinois 20or at any university-operated health care center or dispensary 21that provides care, treatment, and medications for students, 22faculty, and staff. Furthermore, the provisions of this Code 23do not apply to the procurement by such a facility of any 24additional supplies or services that the operator of the 25facility deems necessary for the effective use and functioning 26of the medical supplies or services that are otherwise exempt   SB2187- 5 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1from this Code under this subsection (b-5), including, but not 2limited to, procurements necessary for compliance and 3management of federal programs. However, other supplies and 4services needed for these teaching facilities shall be subject 5to the jurisdiction of the Chief Procurement Officer for 6Public Institutions of Higher Education who may establish 7expedited procurement procedures and may waive or modify 8certification, contract, hearing, process and registration 9requirements required by this Code. All procurements made 10under this subsection shall be documented and may require 11publication in the Illinois Procurement Bulletin. 12    (b-10) Procurements made by or on behalf of the University 13of Illinois for investment services may be entered into or 14renewed without being subject to the requirements of this 15Code. Notice of intent to renew a contract shall be published 16in the Illinois Public Higher Education Procurement Bulletin 17at least 14 days prior to the execution of a renewal, and the 18University of Illinois shall hold a public hearing for 19interested parties to provide public comment. Any contract 20extended, renewed, or entered pursuant to this exception shall 21be published in the Illinois Public Higher Education 22Procurement Bulletin within 5 days of contract execution. 23    (c) Procurements made by or on behalf of public 24institutions of higher education for the fulfillment of a 25grant shall be made in accordance with the requirements of 26this Code to the extent practical.  SB2187- 6 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    Upon the written request of a public institution of higher 2education, the Chief Procurement Officer may waive contract, 3registration, certification, and hearing requirements of this 4Code if, based on the item to be procured or the terms of a 5grant, compliance is impractical. The public institution of 6higher education shall provide the Chief Procurement Officer 7with specific reasons for the waiver, including the necessity 8of contracting with a particular potential contractor, and 9shall certify that an effort was made in good faith to comply 10with the provisions of this Code. The Chief Procurement 11Officer shall provide written justification for any waivers. 12By November 1 of each year, the Chief Procurement Officer 13shall file a report with the General Assembly identifying each 14contract approved with waivers and providing the justification 15given for any waivers for each of those contracts. Notice of 16each waiver made under this subsection shall be published in 17the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar days after 18contract execution. The Chief Procurement Officer shall 19prescribe the form and content of the notice.20    (d) Notwithstanding this Section, a waiver of the 21registration requirements of Section 20-160 does not permit a 22business entity and any affiliated entities or affiliated 23persons to make campaign contributions if otherwise prohibited 24by Section 50-37. The total amount of contracts awarded in 25accordance with this Section shall be included in determining 26the aggregate amount of contracts or pending bids of a   SB2187- 7 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1business entity and any affiliated entities or affiliated 2persons.3    (e) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of Section 50-10.5 of 4this Code, the Chief Procurement Officer, with the approval of 5the Executive Ethics Commission, may permit a public 6institution of higher education to accept a bid or enter into a 7contract with a business that assisted the public institution 8of higher education in determining whether there is a need for 9a contract or assisted in reviewing, drafting, or preparing 10documents related to a bid or contract, provided that the bid 11or contract is essential to research administered by the 12public institution of higher education and it is in the best 13interest of the public institution of higher education to 14accept the bid or contract. For purposes of this subsection, 15"business" includes all individuals with whom a business is 16affiliated, including, but not limited to, any officer, agent, 17employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, 18partner, manager, or shareholder of a business. The Executive 19Ethics Commission may promulgate rules and regulations for the 20implementation and administration of the provisions of this 21subsection (e).22    (e-5) Procurements made by or on behalf of public 23institutions of higher education for food shall be made in 24accordance with Section 25-10. 25    (f) As used in this Section:26    "Grant" means non-appropriated funding provided by a   SB2187- 8 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1federal or private entity to support a project or program 2administered by a public institution of higher education and 3any non-appropriated funding provided to a sub-recipient of 4the grant.5    "Public institution of higher education" means Chicago 6State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 7University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 8University, Northern Illinois University, Southern Illinois 9University, University of Illinois, Western Illinois 10University, and, for purposes of this Code only, the Illinois 11Mathematics and Science Academy.12    (g) (Blank).13    (h) The General Assembly finds and declares that: 14        (1) Public Act 98-1076, which took effect on January 15    1, 2015, changed the repeal date set for this Section from 16    December 31, 2014 to December 31, 2016. 17        (2) The Statute on Statutes sets forth general rules 18    on the repeal of statutes and the construction of multiple 19    amendments, but Section 1 of that Act also states that 20    these rules will not be observed when the result would be 21    "inconsistent with the manifest intent of the General 22    Assembly or repugnant to the context of the statute". 23        (3) This amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly 24    manifests the intention of the General Assembly to remove 25    the repeal of this Section. 26        (4) This Section was originally enacted to protect,   SB2187- 9 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    promote, and preserve the general welfare. Any 2    construction of this Section that results in the repeal of 3    this Section on December 31, 2014 would be inconsistent 4    with the manifest intent of the General Assembly and 5    repugnant to the context of this Code. 6    It is hereby declared to have been the intent of the 7General Assembly that this Section not be subject to repeal on 8December 31, 2014. 9    This Section shall be deemed to have been in continuous 10effect since December 20, 2011 (the effective date of Public 11Act 97-643), and it shall continue to be in effect 12henceforward until it is otherwise lawfully repealed. All 13previously enacted amendments to this Section taking effect on 14or after December 31, 2014, are hereby validated. 15    All actions taken in reliance on or pursuant to this 16Section by any public institution of higher education, person, 17or entity are hereby validated. 18    In order to ensure the continuing effectiveness of this 19Section, it is set forth in full and re-enacted by this 20amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. This 21re-enactment is intended as a continuation of this Section. It 22is not intended to supersede any amendment to this Section 23that is enacted by the 100th General Assembly. 24    In this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, the 25base text of the reenacted Section is set forth as amended by 26Public Act 98-1076. Striking and underscoring is used only to   SB2187- 10 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1show changes being made to the base text. 2    This Section applies to all procurements made on or before 3the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 4Assembly. 5(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-721, eff. 5-6-22; 6102-1119, eff. 1-23-23; 103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-865, eff. 71-1-25.) 8    (30 ILCS 500/20-5)9    Sec. 20-5. Method of source selection. Unless otherwise 10authorized by law, all State contracts shall be awarded by 11competitive sealed bidding, in accordance with Section 20-10, 12except as provided in Sections 20-15, 20-20, 20-25, 20-30, 1320-35, 30-15, and 40-20, and 60-15. The chief procurement 14officers appointed pursuant to Section 10-20 may determine the 15method of solicitation and contract for all procurements 16pursuant to this Code. 17(Source: P.A. 98-1076, eff. 1-1-15.) 18    (30 ILCS 500/45-115 new)19    Sec. 45-115. Alignment with the Good Food Purchasing Law. 20When a State agency or a State-owned facility contract for the 21procurement of food is to be awarded pursuant to Section 20-15 22of this Code, the chief procurement officer must consider the 23following factors and may give preference over other proposers 24to an otherwise qualified proposer who will fulfill the   SB2187- 11 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1contract:2        (1) the good food purchasing core values defined in 3    the Local Food, Farms, and Jobs Act; and 4        (2) good food purchasing equity, accountability, and 5    transparency defined in the Local Food, Farms, and Jobs 6    Act.  7    (30 ILCS 500/Art. 60 heading new)8ARTICLE 60. FOOD PROCUREMENT 9    (30 ILCS 500/60-5 new)10    Sec. 60-5. Applicability. All State agencies and 11State-owned facility food contracts, including public 12institutions of higher education, shall be procured in 13accordance with the provisions of this Article. 14    (30 ILCS 500/60-10 new)15    Sec. 60-10. Authority. Chief procurement officers shall 16have the authority to procure food. 17    (30 ILCS 500/60-15 new)18    Sec. 60-15. Method of source selection. Each State agency 19and State-owned facility food contract shall be awarded by 20competitive sealed proposal in accordance with Section 20-15 21of this Code, except as provided in Sections 20-20 and 20-30. 22The chief procurement officers appointed pursuant to Section   SB2187- 12 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b110-20 may determine the method of solicitation for all 2procurements pursuant to this Act. 3    Section 10. The Local Food, Farms, and Jobs Act is amended 4by changing Sections 1 and 5 and by adding Sections 12, 35, and 540 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 595/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the "Local 8Food, Farms, and Jobs Act". This Act may be referred to as the 9Good Food Purchasing Law. 10(Source: P.A. 96-579, eff. 8-18-09.) 11    (30 ILCS 595/5)12    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 13    "Good Food Purchasing Program core values" means Good Food 14Purchasing Program procurement criteria based on all of the 15following: 16        (1) Prioritizing local suppliers, especially small or 17    mid-sized farms, food manufacturers, or food businesses 18    that are privately or cooperatively operated or operated 19    as a not-for-profit within (i) a 250-mile radius for food 20    other than meat, poultry, or seafood or (ii) a 500-mile 21    radius for meat, poultry, or seafood, prioritizing 22    suppliers that are entrepreneurs of color and community 23    members most impacted by current and historic economic   SB2187- 13 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    marginalization, leveraging institutional buying power, 2    infrastructure, financial resources, staff time, and land 3    in support of community members, food producers, and food 4    workers who have experienced negative systemic social or 5    economic impact, building partnerships with community 6    members to ensure that food products and menus reflect the 7    interests and cultures of everyone they serve, and 8    identifying pathways for purchasing from small and 9    community-based suppliers for products that cannot be 10    grown or harvested within the mileage limitations, such as 11    seafood, coffee, cocoa, and sugar. 12        (2) Prioritizing suppliers that consider: (i) 13    community health and universal rights to clean air and 14    water; (ii) reduction or elimination of synthetic 15    pesticides and fertilizers; (iii) improved soil health and 16    carbon sequestration; (iv) reduced fossil fuel energy 17    inputs and protection of water resources; (v) biodiversity 18    and ecological resilience; (vi) food waste reduction; 19    (vii) greenhouse gas emission reduction; and (viii) 20    reduction or elimination of single-use plastics and other 21    resource-intensive packaging and reducing carbon and water 22    footprint of food purchases. 23        (3) Sourcing from producers and vendors that (i) 24    comply with labor laws, including minimum wage laws, 25    through contractual requirements and enforcement, (ii) 26    honor the right to freedom of association, (iii) provide   SB2187- 14 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    workers with the ability to organize a union and to 2    bargain collectively, free from reprisal, for livable 3    wages and safe and healthy working conditions, and (iv) 4    uphold and implement workers' rights principles, and (v) 5    implement cooperative ownership, democratic 6    decision-making, and migrant, racial, and gender justice. 7        (4) Sourcing from farms and ranches that provide 8    healthy and humane conditions for farm animals throughout 9    their lives through (i) nutrition, (ii) physical 10    environment, (iii) health, (iv) behavioral interaction; 11    and (v) mental or affective state. 12        (5) Promoting community health, nutrition, equitable 13    access, and food sovereignty by prioritizing high-quality 14    and culturally relevant whole or minimally processed 15    foods, including vegetables, fruit, and whole grains, and 16    plant-forward meals. Preservation methods such as canning 17    and bottling using oils, sugar, or salt are not permitted. 18        (6) In general, prioritizing products certified under 19    certifications currently endorsed by anorganization 20    managing the Good Food Purchasing Program. 21    "Good Food Purchasing Program equity, accountability, and 22transparency" means: 23        (1) Having or developing a supplier or vendor 24    diversification plan with goals that include reporting and 25    accountability measures. Measures should be disaggregated 26    by demographic group, including race and gender.   SB2187- 15 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1        (2) Planning implementation should prioritize 2    purchases and address barriers to entry for suppliers who 3    have experienced negative systemic social or economic 4    impacts including, but not limited to women, veterans, 5    persons with disabilities, and especially people of color, 6    across all supply chains and to the greatest extent 7    possible. 8        (3) Sharing purchasing data, assessments, purchasing 9    targets, or implementation plans in a publicly accessible 10    location including online with community members to 11    facilitate engagement and transparency. 12        (4) Engaging with community members, including, but 13    not limited to, people served by meal programs, food 14    service workers, constituents, and local food businesses, 15    in informing values-based purchasing decisions and 16    processes. 17        (5) Developing and implementing comprehensive 18    institutional policies that reflect community needs and 19    values and prioritize transparency, racial equity, local 20    economies, environmental sustainability, valued 21    workforce, animal welfare, and community health and 22    nutrition within their operations and food procurement. 23        (6) Ensuring that institutional policies are embedded 24    in agreements for contracted food services and that 25    mechanisms are developed to ensure compliance and 26    accountability through reporting and active contract   SB2187- 16 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    management. 2    "Minimally processed foods" means foods that are unaltered 3or slightly altered from the food's natural state through such 4processes as removal of inedible or unwanted parts, drying, 5powdering, squeezing, crushing, grinding, fractioning, 6steaming, poaching, boiling, roasting, pasteurization, 7chilling, freezing, placing in containers, vacuum packaging, 8nonalcoholic fermentation, and other methods that do not add 9to the original food, salt, sugar oils or fats, or food 10substances, other than additives that prolong product 11duration, protect original properties, or prevent 12proliferation of microorganisms. "Minimally processed foods" 13include, but are not limited to, whole grains or flours; fresh 14or frozen fruits and vegetables; meat, poultry, fish, and 15seafood, whole or in the form of steaks, fillets, and other 16cuts; fresh or pasteurized milk, eggs, fresh or pasteurized 17plain yogurt, legumes, and nuts and seeds. "Minimally 18processed foods" also includes foods made of 2 or more items in 19this group, such as dried mixed fruits, and foods with 20vitamins and minerals generally added to replace nutrients 21lost during minimal processing, such as flour fortified with 22iron and folic acid. 23"Local farm or food products" are products: (1) grown in 24Illinois; or (2) processed and packaged in Illinois, using at 25least one ingredient grown in Illinois.26(Source: P.A. 101-258, eff. 1-1-20.)   SB2187- 17 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    (30 ILCS 595/12 new)2    Sec. 12. Good Food Purchasing Program.3    (a) No later than one year after the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each State 5agency and State-owned facility that purchases food, 6including, without limitation, facilities for persons with 7mental health and developmental disabilities, correction 8facilities, and public institutions of higher education, 9including community colleges, shall have a timely plan for 10undergoing a Good Food Purchasing baseline assessment 11conducted by a national organization equipped to conduct such 12assessment, to determine current alignment with Good Food 13Purchasing core values and Good Food Purchasing equity, 14transparency, and accountability and how better to meet the 15Good Food Purchasing core values and Good Food Purchasing 16equity, transparency, and accountability. 17    (b) No later than one year after completion of the 18baseline assessment under subsection (a), each State agency 19and State-owned facility shall develop and adopt a multi-year 20action plan with benchmarks to align food purchasing processes 21with Good Food Purchasing equity, transparency, and 22accountability and food purchases with Good Food Purchasing 23core values. 24    (c) Upon adoption of the multi-year action plan required 25under subsection (b) of this Section, each State agency and   SB2187- 18 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1State-owned facility shall procure food pursuant to Section 220-15 of the Illinois Procurement Code. 3    (d) The year after completing the multi-year action plan 4and each year thereafter, each State agency and State-owned 5facility shall undergo a Good Food Purchasing assessment and 6update its multi-year action plan to annually increase the 7procurement of food that meets the Good Food Purchasing core 8values and Good Food Purchasing equity, transparency, and 9accountability. 10    (e) (Blank). 11    (f) To facilitate reporting required under this Section, 12all State agencies and State-owned facilities that purchase 13food shall include in all requests for proposals, and 14contracts a requirement for vendor data-sharing, including, 15but not limited to, product types, quantities, sizes, prices, 16origin, processors, and distributors. 17    (g) On each January 1 following adoption of a multi-year 18action plan, each State agency and State-owned facility that 19purchases food shall publish in its procurement bulletin and 20on its website, in the form and format prescribed by the chief 21procurement officer, notice of its purchases of food in the 22immediately preceding fiscal year, its Good Food Purchasing 9 23baseline and annual assessments, in the immediately preceding 24fiscal year and its multi-year 10 action plan. 25    (h) Under the procedures laid out in under subsection (h) 26of Section 5-5 of the Illinois Procurement Code, the   SB2187- 19 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1Procurement Policy Board may review a proposal or contract and 2issue a recommendation to void a contract or reject a proposal 3based on a vendor's or proposer's current violation or history 4of violation of federal, State, or local law, including, but 5not limited to, federal labor laws under Title 29 of the United 6States Code and the Minimum Wage Law.  7    (30 ILCS 595/35 new)8    Sec. 35. Good Food Purchasing Task Force.9    (a) The Good Food Purchasing Task Force created by House 10Joint Resolution 33 adopted in the 102nd General Assembly is 11reestablished and shall continue with its study of current 12procurement of food within the State and to explore how good 13food purchasing can be implemented to maximize the procurement 14of healthy foods that are sustainably, locally, and equitably 15sourced. 16    (b) Any action taken in reliance on House Joint Resolution 1733 of the 102nd General Assembly after January 1, 2023 by any 18person or entity is hereby validated. 19    (c) The Task Force shall consist of the following members, 20who shall serve without compensation: 21        (1) the Lieutenant Governor or his or her designee; 22        (2) the Speaker of the House of Representatives or his 23    or her designee; 24        (3) the Minority Leader of the House of 25    Representatives or his or her designee;   SB2187- 20 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1        (4) the Senate President or his or her designee; 2        (5) the Senate Minority Leader or his or her designee; 3        (6) one member nominated by a statewide local food 4    advocacy organization and appointed by the Lieutenant 5    Governor; 6        (7) one member nominated by a national multi-sector 7    food advocacy organization and appointed by the Lieutenant 8    Governor; 9        (8) one member nominated by a Chicago-based food 10    advocacy organization and appointed by the Lieutenant 11    Governor; 12        (9) one member nominated by a statewide environmental 13    advocacy organization and appointed by the Lieutenant 14    Governor; 15        (10) one member nominated by a statewide labor 16    organization that represents food workers and appointed by 17    the Lieutenant Governor; 18        (11) one member nominated by a national farm-animal 19    welfare organization and appointed by the Lieutenant 20    Governor; 21        (12) the Director of the Department of Commerce and 22    Economic Opportunity or his or her designee; 23        (13) the Director of the Environmental Protection 24    Agency or his or her designee; 25        (14) the Director of the Department of Public Health 26    or his or her designee;   SB2187- 21 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1        (15) the Director of the Department of Natural 2    Resources or his or her designee; 3        (16) the Chief Procurement Officer for General 4    Services or his or her designee; 5        (17) the Chief Procurement Officer for Higher 6    Education or his or her designee; 7        (18) the Chief Procurement Officer for the Secretary 8    of State's Office or his or her designee; 9        (19) the Director of Corrections or his or her 10    designee; 11        (20) the Secretary of Human Services or his or her 12    designee; 13        (21) the Director of Central Management Services or 14    his or her designee; 15        (22) the Director of the Department of Agriculture or 16    his or her designee; and 17        (23) one member nominated by a statewide organization 18    that advocates for healthy nutrition and appointed by 19    Lieutenant Governor. 20    Members of the Task Force shall serve without 21compensation. The Task Force members shall select a 22chairperson at the first meeting of the Task Force. Any member 23appointed under House Joint Resolution 33 of the 102nd General 24Assembly who was a member of the Task Force at the end of the 25102nd General Assembly shall continue to serve on the Task 26Force until the appointed member resigns or is otherwise   SB2187- 22 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1removed from the Task Force. 2    (d) The Department of Agriculture shall provide 3administrative support for the Task Force. 4    (e) The task force shall submit its interim report to the 5Governor and General Assembly no later than one year after the 6effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly and its final report 2 years after the effective date 8of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 9Following submission of the final report, the Task Force shall 10continue to meet to monitor and support implementation of this 11Act.  12    (30 ILCS 595/40 new)13    Sec. 40. Good Food Purchasing Fund. The Good Food 14Purchasing Fund is established as a special fund in the State 15treasury. Interest earned by the Good Food Purchasing Fund 16shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are 17continuously appropriated to the Department of Agriculture to 18administer this Act, including by created a Good Food 19Purchasing office within the Department, hiring staff, and 20providing training and technical assistance to State agencies 21and State-owned facilities that purchase food. The fund shall 22be subject to appropriations; however, the Department shall be 23permitted to accept federal government, local government, and 24private resources at any time to implement this Act.   SB2187- 23 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    (30 ILCS 595/10 rep.)2    Section 15. The Local Food, Farms, and Jobs Act is amended 3by repealing Section 10. 4    Section 20. The Food Handling Regulation Enforcement Act 5is amended by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 625/4)7    Sec. 4. Cottage food operation.8    (a) For the purpose of this Section:9    A food is "acidified" if: (i) acid or acid ingredients are 10added to it to produce a final equilibrium pH of 4.6 or below 11and a water activity greater than 0.85; or (ii) it is fermented 12to produce a final equilibrium pH of 4.6 or below. 13    "Canned food" means food that has been heat processed 14sufficiently under United States Department of Agriculture 15guidelines to enable storing the food at normal home 16temperatures. 17    "Cottage food operation" means an operation conducted by a 18person who produces or packages food or drink, other than 19foods and drinks listed as prohibited in paragraph (1.5) of 20subsection (b) of this Section, in a kitchen located in that 21person's primary domestic residence or another appropriately 22designed and equipped kitchen on a farm for direct sale by the 23owner, a family member, or an employee.24    "Cut leafy greens" means fresh leafy greens whose leaves   SB2187- 24 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1have been cut, shredded, sliced, chopped, or torn. "Cut leafy 2greens" does not mean cut-to-harvest leafy greens. 3    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 4    "Employee" means a person who is employed by and receives 5monetary compensation from a cottage food operator. 6    "Equilibrium pH" means the final potential of hydrogen 7measured in an acidified food after all the components of the 8food have achieved the same acidity. 9    "Farmers' market" means a common facility or area where 10farmers gather to sell a variety of fresh fruits and 11vegetables and other locally produced farm and food products 12directly to consumers. 13    "Leafy greens" includes iceberg lettuce; romaine lettuce; 14leaf lettuce; butter lettuce; baby leaf lettuce, such as 15immature lettuce or leafy greens; escarole; endive; spring 16mix; spinach; cabbage; kale; arugula; and chard. "Leafy 17greens" does not include microgreens or herbs such as cilantro 18or parsley. 19    "Local health department" means a State-certified health 20department of a unit of local government in which a cottage 21food operation is located or, if the cottage food operation is 22located in a county that does not have a local health 23department, is registered.24    "Local public health department association" means an 25association solely representing 2 or more State-certified 26local health departments.  SB2187- 25 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    "Low-acid canned food" means any canned food with a 2finished equilibrium pH greater than 4.6 and a water activity 3greater than 0.85. 4    "Microgreen" means an edible plant seedling grown in soil 5or substrate and harvested above the soil or substrate line. 6    "Mobile farmers markets" means a farmers market that is 7operated from a movable motor drive or propelled vehicle or 8trailer that can change location, including a farmers market 9that is owned and operated by a farmer or a third party selling 10products on behalf of farmers or cottage food operations with 11the intent of a direct sale to an end consumer. 12    "Sprout" means any seedling intended for human consumption 13that was produced in a manner that does not meet the definition 14of microgreen. 15    "Time/temperature control for safety food" means a food 16that is stored under time or temperature control for food 17safety according to the Department's administrative rules. 18    (b) A cottage food operation may produce homemade food and 19drink provided that all of the following conditions are met:20        (1) (Blank).21        (1.3) A cottage food operation must register with the 22    local health department for the unit of local government 23    in which it is located, but may sell products outside of 24    the unit of local government where the cottage food 25    operation is located. If a county does not have a local 26    health department, the county shall enter into an   SB2187- 26 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    agreement or contract with a local health department in an 2    adjacent county to register cottage food operations in the 3    jurisdiction of the county that does not have a health 4    department. The adjacent local health department where the 5    cottage food operation registers has the powers described 6    in subsection (d). A copy of the certificate of 7    registration must be available upon request by any local 8    health department. 9        (1.5) A cottage food operation shall not sell or offer 10    to sell the following food items or processed foods 11    containing the following food items, except as indicated:12            (A) meat, poultry, fish, seafood, or shellfish;13            (B) dairy, except as an ingredient in a baked good 14        or candy that is not a time/temperature control for 15        safety food, such as caramel, subject to paragraph 16        (4), or as an ingredient in a baked good frosting, such 17        as buttercream;18            (C) eggs, except as an ingredient in a food that is 19        not a time/temperature control for safety food, 20        including dry noodles, or as an ingredient in a baked 21        good frosting, such as buttercream, if the eggs are 22        not raw;23            (D) pumpkin pies, sweet potato pies, cheesecakes, 24        custard pies, creme pies, and pastries with 25        time/temperature control for safety foods that are 26        fillings or toppings;  SB2187- 27 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1            (E) garlic in oil or oil infused with garlic, 2        except if the garlic oil is acidified;3            (F) low-acid canned foods;4            (G) sprouts;5            (H) cut leafy greens, except for cut leafy greens 6        that are dehydrated, acidified, or blanched and 7        frozen;8            (I) cut or pureed fresh tomato or melon;9            (J) dehydrated tomato or melon;10            (K) frozen cut melon;11            (L) wild-harvested, non-cultivated mushrooms;12            (M) alcoholic beverages; or13            (N) kombucha. 14        (1.6) In order to sell canned tomatoes or a canned 15    product containing tomatoes, a cottage food operator shall 16    either: 17            (A) follow exactly a recipe that has been tested 18        by the United States Department of Agriculture or by a 19        state cooperative extension located in this State or 20        any other state in the United States; or21            (B) submit the recipe, at the cottage food 22        operator's expense, to a commercial laboratory 23        according to the commercial laboratory's directions to 24        test that the product has been adequately acidified; 25        use only the varietal or proportionate varietals of 26        tomato included in the tested recipe for all   SB2187- 28 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1        subsequent batches of such recipe; and provide 2        documentation of the annual test results of the recipe 3        submitted under this subparagraph upon registration 4        and to an inspector upon request during any inspection 5        authorized by subsection (d). 6        (2) In order to sell a fermented or acidified food, a 7    cottage food operation shall either:8            (A) submit a recipe that has been tested by the 9        United States Department of Agriculture or a 10        cooperative extension system located in this State or 11        any other state in the United States; or12            (B) submit a written food safety plan for each 13        category of products for which the cottage food 14        operator uses the same procedures, such as pickles, 15        kimchi, or hot sauce, and a pH test for a single 16        product that is representative of that category; the 17        written food safety plan shall be submitted annually 18        upon registration and each pH test shall be submitted 19        every 3 years; the food safety plan shall adhere to 20        guidelines developed by the Department.21        (3) A fermented or acidified food shall be packaged 22    according to one of the following standards:23            (A) A fermented or acidified food that is canned 24        must be processed in a boiling water bath in a 25        Mason-style jar or glass container with a 26        tight-fitting lid.  SB2187- 29 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1            (B) A fermented or acidified food that is not 2        canned shall be sold in any container that is new, 3        clean, and seals properly and must be stored, 4        transported, and sold at or below 41 degrees. 5        (4) In order to sell a baked good with cheese, a local 6    health department may require a cottage food operation to 7    submit a recipe, at the cottage food operator's expense, 8    to a commercial laboratory to verify that it is not a 9    time/temperature time-or-temperature control for safety 10    food before allowing the cottage food operation to sell 11    the baked good as a cottage food.12        (5) For a cottage food operation that does not utilize 13    a municipal water supply, such as an operation using a 14    private well, a local health department may require a 15    water sample test to verify that the water source being 16    used meets public safety standards related to E. coli 17    coliform. If a test is requested, it must be conducted at 18    the cottage food operator's expense.19        (6) A person preparing or packaging a product as part 20    of a cottage food operation must be a Department-approved 21    certified food protection manager.22        (7) Food packaging must conform with the labeling 23    requirements of the Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. 24    A cottage food product shall be prepackaged and the food 25    packaging shall be affixed with a prominent label that 26    includes the following:  SB2187- 30 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1            (A) the name of the cottage food operation and 2        unit of local government in which the cottage food 3        operation is located;4            (B) the identifying registration number provided 5        by the local health department on the certificate of 6        registration and the name of the municipality or 7        county in which the registration was filed;8            (C) the common or usual name of the food product;9            (D) all ingredients of the food product, including 10        any color, artificial flavor, and preservative, listed 11        in descending order by predominance of weight shown 12        with the common or usual names;13            (E) the following phrase in prominent lettering: 14        "This product was produced in a home kitchen not 15        inspected by a health department that may also process 16        common food allergens. If you have safety concerns, 17        contact your local health department.";18            (F) the date the product was processed; and19            (G) allergen labeling as specified under federal 20        labeling requirements. 21        (8) Food packaging may include the designation 22    "Illinois-grown", "Illinois-sourced", or "Illinois farm 23    product" if the packaged product is (1) grown in Illinois; 24    or (2) processed and packaged in Illinois, using at least 25    one ingredient grown in Illinois a local farm or food 26    product as that term is defined in Section 5 of the Local   SB2187- 31 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    Food, Farms, and Jobs Act.2        (9) In the case of a product that is difficult to 3    properly label or package, or for other reasons, the local 4    health department of the location where the product is 5    sold may grant permission to sell products that are not 6    prepackaged, in which case other prominent written notice 7    shall be provided to the purchaser.8        (10) At the point of sale, notice must be provided in a 9    prominent location that states the following: "This 10    product was produced in a home kitchen not inspected by a 11    health department that may also process common food 12    allergens." At a physical display, notice shall be a 13    placard. Online, notice shall be a message on the cottage 14    food operation's online sales interface at the point of 15    sale.16        (11) Food and drink produced by a cottage food 17    operation shall be sold directly to consumers for their 18    own consumption and not for resale. Sales directly to 19    consumers include, but are not limited to, sales at or 20    through:21            (A) farmers' markets;22            (B) fairs, festivals, public events, or online;23            (C) pickup from the private home or farm of the 24        cottage food operator, if the pickup is not prohibited 25        by any law of the unit of local government that applies 26        equally to all cottage food operations; in a   SB2187- 32 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1        municipality with a population of 1,000,000 or more, a 2        cottage food operator shall comply with any law of the 3        municipality that applies equally to all home-based 4        businesses; 5            (D) delivery to the customer;6            (E) pickup from a third-party private property 7        with the consent of the third-party property holder; 8        and 9            (F) mobile farmers markets.10        (12) Only food that is not a time/temperature 11    time-or-temperature control for safety food may be 12    shipped. A cottage food product shall not be shipped out 13    of State. Each cottage food product that is shipped must 14    be sealed in a manner that reveals tampering, including, 15    but not limited to, a sticker or pop top. 16        (13) Alcohol may be used to make extracts, such as 17    vanilla extract, or may be used as an ingredient in baked 18    goods as long as the created product is not intended for 19    use as a beverage.20        (14) Time/temperature control for safety foods shall 21    be maintained and transported at holding temperatures as 22    set in the Department's administrative rules to ensure the 23    food's safety and limit microorganism growth or toxin 24    formation.25        (15) A product assessment of pH and water activity may 26    be used to show that a product is non-time or temperature   SB2187- 33 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    controlled for food safety and does not require 2    temperature control. 3    (c) A local health department shall register any eligible 4cottage food operation that meets the requirements of this 5Section and shall issue a certificate of registration with an 6identifying registration number to each registered cottage 7food operation. A local health department may establish a 8self-certification program for cottage food operators to 9affirm compliance with applicable laws, rules, and 10regulations. Registration shall be completed annually and the 11local health department may impose a fee not to exceed $50. 12    (d) In the event of a consumer complaint or foodborne 13illness outbreak, upon notice from a different local health 14department, or if the Department or a local health department 15has reason to believe that an imminent health hazard exists or 16that a cottage food operation's product has been found to be 17misbranded, adulterated, or not in compliance with the 18conditions for cottage food operations set forth in this 19Section, the Department or the local health department may:20        (1) inspect the premises of the cottage food operation 21    in question;22        (2) set a reasonable fee for the inspection; and23        (3) invoke penalties and the cessation of the sale of 24    cottage food products until it deems that the situation 25    has been addressed to the satisfaction of the Department 26    or local health department; if the situation is not   SB2187- 34 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1    amenable to being addressed, the local health department 2    may revoke the cottage food operation's registration 3    following a process outlined by the local health 4    department. 5    (e) A local health department that receives a consumer 6complaint or a report of foodborne illness related to a 7cottage food operator in another jurisdiction shall refer the 8complaint or report to the local health department where the 9cottage food operator is registered. 10    (f) By January 1, 2022, the Department, in collaboration 11with local public health department associations and other 12stakeholder groups, shall write and issue administrative 13guidance to local health departments on the following: 14        (1) development of a standard registration form, 15    including, if applicable, a written food safety plan;16        (2) development of a Home-Certification Self Checklist 17    Form;18        (3) development of a standard inspection form and 19    inspection procedures; and20        (4) procedures for cottage food operation workspaces 21    that include, but are not limited to, cleaning products, 22    general sanitation, and requirements for functional 23    equipment.24    (g) A person who produces or packages a baked good that is 25not a time/temperature control for safety food for sale by a 26religious, charitable, or nonprofit organization for   SB2187- 35 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1fundraising purposes is exempt from the requirements of this 2Section.3    (h) A home rule unit may not regulate cottage food 4operations in a manner inconsistent with the regulation by the 5State of cottage food operations under this Section. This 6Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 7Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 8exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 9by the State.10    (i) The Department may adopt rules as may be necessary to 11implement the provisions of this Section.12(Source: P.A. 102-633, eff. 1-1-22; 103-903, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-25-24.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.  SB2187- 36 -LRB104 09079 HLH 19135 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    30 ILCS 500/1-134    30 ILCS 500/20-55    30 ILCS 500/45-115 new6    30 ILCS 500/Art. 60 7    heading new8    30 ILCS 500/60-5 new9    30 ILCS 500/60-10 new10    30 ILCS 500/60-15 new11    30 ILCS 595/112    30 ILCS 595/513    30 ILCS 595/12 new14    30 ILCS 595/35 new15    30 ILCS 595/40 new16    30 ILCS 595/10 rep.17    410 ILCS 625/4